en: Heirloom tomatoe, Heritage tomatoe
fr: Tomate ancienne, Tomate variété ancienne

en: Lima bean raw
fr: Haricot de Lima cru
hr: Lima grah sirov
nl: Limabonen (rauw)

en: Biscuit (cookie) vitamins content guaranteed
fr: Biscuit sec à teneur garantie en vitamines

en: Biscuit (cookie) vitamins and chemical elements content guaranteed
fr: Biscuit sec à teneur garantie en vitamines et minéraux

en: Biscuit (cookie) snack w chocolate filling
fr: Goûter sec fourré (sandwiché) parfum chocolat

en: Poultry paupiette
fr: Paupiette de volaille

en: Plant-based sausage with wheat or seitan
fr: Saucisse végétale au blé ou seitan préemballé

en: Soy-based patty plain (vegetable steak) prepacked
fr: Galette ou pavé au soja et légumes préemballé

en: Skipjack tuna raw
fr: Thon listao ou Bonite à ventre rayé cru

en: Pork shoulder lower half without rind fat and bone raw
fr: Porc hachage sans jarret sans bateau découenné dégraisssé désossé cru

en: Lardoons cooked
fr: Lardon nature cuit

en: Smoked lardoons cooked
fr: Lardon fumé cuit

en: Cooked pork shoulder choice
fr: Épaule de porc cuite choix découennée dégraissée

en: Cooked ham choice rind less and fatless
fr: Jambon cuit choix découenné dégraissé

en: Chicken leg meat and skin raw
fr: Poulet cuisse viande et peau cru

en: Frozen chicken leg meat and skin raw
fr: Poulet cuisse viande et peau cru surgelée

en: Chicken meat and skin roasted/baked
fr: Poulet viande et peau rôti/cuit au four

en: Chicken white race meat and skin raw
fr: Poulet (var. blanc) viande et peau cru

en: Chicken free-range meat and skin raw
fr: Poulets fermiers, Poulet fermier viande et peau cru

en: Chicken stewing leg raw
fr: Poule cuisse crue